Arkansas, session 2025, HB1972.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 26-52-401, concerning the sales tax
exemptions for various products and services, is amended to add an additional
subdivision to read as follows:
(45) Gross receipts or gross proceeds derived from the sale of
tangible personal property, specified digital products, a digital code, or a
service to the Helena West Helena Future Leaders Youth Sports Association.

SECTION 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. Section 1 of this act is effective on the
first day of the calendar quarter following the effective date of this act.







*JLL368*
04/01/2025 9:54:26 AM JLL368